South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5006.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "State of South Carolina Small Business Tax Cut of 2026." SECTION 2.A.  Section 12-37-220(B) of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (54) the first ten thousand dollars of the net depreciated value of business personal property owned by a small business.  For purposes of this item, "small business" means a commercial retail service, industry entity, or nonprofit corporation, including affiliates, that: (a) the business' ownership is comprised of taxpayers who pay income taxes in this State; (b) is independently owned and operated; and (c) employs fewer than one hundred full-time employees or has gross annual sales of less than ten million dollars. B. This SECTION takes effect upon approval by the Governor and first applies to property tax years beginning after 2026. SECTION 3.A.  Section 12-37-900 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 12-37-900. (A) Every person required by law to list property shall, annually, between the first day of January and the first day of March, make out and deliver to the assessor of the county in which the property is by law to be returned for taxation a statement, verified by his oath, of all the real estate which has been sold or transferred since the last listing of property for which he was responsible and to whom, and of all real property possessed by him, or under his control, on the thirty-first day of December next preceding, either as owner, agent, parent, spouse, guardian, executor, administrator, trustee, receiver, officer, partner, factor, or holder with the value thereof, on such thirty-first day of December, at the place of return, estimating according to the rules prescribed by law. (B) A manufacturer not under a fee agreement is not required to return personal property for ad valorem tax purposes if the property remains in this State at a manufacturing facility that has not been operational for one fiscal year and the personal property has not been used in operations for one fiscal year. The personal property is not required to be returned until the personal property becomes operational in a manufacturing process or until the property has not been returned for ad valorem tax purposes for four years, whichever is earlier. A manufacturer must continue to list the personal property annually and designate on the listing that the personal property is not subject to tax pursuant to this section. (C)(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a taxpayer that meets the application requirements of item (2) is not required to pay business personal property taxes if the taxpayer has less than ten thousand dollars of net depreciated value of business personal property. (2) To claim the exemption allowed by item (1), a taxpayer must annually certify, under penalty of perjury, to the department in a manner prescribed by the department that the taxpayer has less than ten thousand dollars of net depreciated value of business personal property. The form prescribed by the department must contain a conspicuous notation citing the State of South Carolina Small Business Tax Cut of 2026 as the source of the exemption. B. This SECTION takes effect upon approval by the Governor and first applies to property tax years beginning after 2026. SECTION 4.A.  Article 5, Chapter 37, Title 12 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 12-37-980. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all business personal property required to be returned for ad valorem taxation must be returned to the Department of Revenue. The property is subject to the tax imposed by the taxing jurisdiction in which the property is situated. B. This SECTION takes effect upon approval by the Governor and first applies to property tax years beginning after 2026. SECTION 5.A.  Section 12-20-50 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (D)(1) A corporation subject to the provisions of this section whose corporate headquarters, as defined in Section 12-6-3410, is in South Carolina may exclude the first fifty million dollars of equity contributions from a qualifying entity from its paid-in or capital surplus subject to the annual license fee. To qualify for this exclusion, the corporation must obtain a certificate from the South Carolina Research Authority certifying that the exclusions result from equity contributions from a qualifying entity. (2) For purposes of this subsection, a qualifying entity includes: (a) a venture capital fund as defined pursuant to 17 C.F.R. Section 275.203(1) 1; (b) an angel or accredited investor, as defined pursuant to 17 C.F.R. Section 230.501; and (c) a private investment firm that does not solicit capital from investors, excluding another qualifying entity or the general public, and meets one of the exemptions outlined in the Investment Company Act of 1940. (3) A corporation claiming this exclusion must: (a) submit an annual report to the department that contains the name of each qualifying entity, the date of the equity contribution, the manner in which the qualifying entity meets the requirements of item (2), the amount of the paid-in or capital surplus for each year that is attributable to each qualifying entity, and any other information that the department may require; and (b) keep detailed books and records, including segregating out equity contributions attributable to each qualifying entity and retaining information concerning the information required to be provided in subitem (a). B.This SECTION takes effect upon approval by the Governor and first applies to the tax year beginning after July 1, 2026. SECTION 6.A.  Article 3, Chapter 37, Title 12 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 12-37-253. (A) Any eligible person may claim an exemption from county, municipal, school, and special assessment real property taxes equal to an amount of the fair market value on the person's dwelling place as set forth in subsection (C). A person may not claim this exemption and the exemption set forth in Section 12-37-250 and a person must be eligible for this exemption to claim the exemption set forth in Section 12-37-250. For purposes of eligibility, application, and reimbursement, this exemption must be administered in the same manner as the exemption allowed pursuant to Section 12-37-250, including the application of other laws affecting the exemption allowed pursuant to Section 12-37-250, mutatis mutandis. For a person eligible for this exemption pursuant to subsection (B)(1), the previous application for the exemption allowed pursuant to Section 12-37-250 must be considered the application for this exemption. (B) A person becomes eligible for this additional exemption: (1) if the person was eligible to claim the exemption pursuant to Section 12-37-250 in Property Tax Year 2025 and otherwise qualifies; (2)(a) when the person meets the requirements of Section 12-37-250(A)(1)(i), (ii), or (iii); and (b) when the person has been a resident of this State for at least five entire property tax years and filed an individual income tax return for at least five tax years in this State at any time before the application; or (3)(a) when the person meets the requirements of Section 12-37-250(A)(1)(i), (ii), or (iii); and (b) when the person has been a resident of this State for at least ten entire property tax years and filed an individual income tax return for at least ten tax years in this State at any time before the application. (C) A person who qualifies for this exemption pursuant to item (B)(1) or (B)(3) qualifies for a one hundred fifty thousand dollar exemption. A person who qualifies for this exemption pursuant to item (B)(2) qualifies for a seventy-five thousand dollar exemption. The exemption amounts set forth in this subsection are not cumulative and may not be combined. (D) By ordinance, a governing body of a county may increase the exemption allowed by this section; however, any taxes not collected as a result of the increase in the exemption are not eligible for reimbursement. B. Section 11-11-150(A) of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (6) Section 12-37-270 for the homestead exemption allowed pursuant to Section 12-37-253; C.  Section 12-37-245 of the S.C. Code is repealed. D. Chapter 45, Title 12 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 12-45-72.  In addition to the requirements provided in Section 12-60-2510, a property tax notice or assessment must include an itemized list of any homestead exemption received by the taxpayer and a notation of State Legislature Aiding in Saving Homes (SLASH), the amount in which the individual's property tax bill was reduced, and in the amount, if any, in which the State reimbursed the local taxing authorities on behalf of the individual. E. If any section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, phrase, or word of this SECTION is for any reason held to be unconstitutional or invalid, the General Assembly hereby declares that it would not have passed this SECTION, without the sections, subsections, paragraphs, subparagraphs, sentences, clauses, phrases, or words declared to be unconstitutional, invalid, or otherwise ineffective. F. This SECTION takes effect upon approval by the Governor and first applies to property tax years beginning after 2025. SECTION 7.A.  Section 12-37-220(B)(11) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (11)(a) all property of nonprofit housing corporations devoted exclusively to providing below-cost housing for the aged or for handicapped persons or for both aged and handicapped persons as authorized by Section 202 of the Housing Act of 1959 and regulated in part by 24 C.F.R. Part 885; (b) all property of nonprofit housing corporations devoted exclusively to providing below-cost supportive housing for elderly persons or households as authorized by Section 202 of the Housing Act of 1959 as amended under Section 801 of the National Affordable Housing Act of 1990 and regulated in part by 24 C.F.R. Part 889; (c) all property of nonprofit housing corporations devoted exclusively to providing below-cost supportive housing for persons with disabilities as authorized by Section 811 of the National Affordable Housing Act of 1990 and regulated in part by 24 C.F.R. Part 890; (d) all property of nonprofit housing corporations devoted exclusively to providing rental or cooperative housing and related facilities for elderly or handicapped persons or families of low or moderate income as authorized by Section 515 of Title V of the Housing Act of 1949; (e)(i) all property of nonprofit housing corporations or instrumentalities of these corporations when the property is devoted to providing housing to low or very low income residents.  A Except as otherwise provided in this subitem, a nonprofit housing corporation or its instrumentality must satisfy the safe harbor provisions of Revenue Procedure 96-32 issued by the Internal Revenue Service for this exemption to apply.  For purposes of this subitem, property of nonprofit housing corporations or instrumentalities of these corporations includes all leasehold interests in property owned by an entity that provides housing accommodations to persons of low or very low income, and in which a wholly owned affiliate or wholly owned instrumentality of a nonprofit housing corporation is the general partner, managing member, or the equivalent. However, except as otherwise provided in this subitem, the exemption allowed by this subitem only applies if the property of nonprofit housing corporations or instrumentalities of these corporations satisfies the safe harbor provisions of Revenue Procedure 96-32 issued by the Internal Revenue Service; (ii) the exemption allowed by this subitem must be proportionate to the nonprofit housing corporation's percentage of direct or indirect ownership in the qualifying property, except that if: (A) the nonprofit housing corporation's percentage of direct or indirect ownership interest in the qualifying property exceeds fifty percent; or (B) notwithstanding the unit mix prescribed by the safe harbor provisions of Revenue Procedure 96-32, all of the units in the property are devoted to providing housing to residents who qualify as low income under Revenue Procedure 96-32, then the exemption allowed by this subitem equals one hundred percent; (iii) to claim the exemption allowed by this subitem, the nonprofit housing corporation or its instrumentality must apply to the department and certify the nonprofit housing corporation's percentage of direct or indirect ownership in the property and provide a rent roll or other suitable documentation evidencing compliance with the requirements of Revenue Procedure 96-32, as applicable. Such initial certification must be made by the first penalty date for the property tax year in which the exemption is first claimed for the property. In each subsequent year in which the exemption allowed by this subitem is claimed, the nonprofit housing corporation or its instrumentality must submit an annual certification to the department by October first. The annual certification must provide the current percentage of the nonprofit housing corporation's direct or indirect ownership in the property and current rent roll or other suitable documentation evidencing compliance with the requirements of Revenue Procedure 96-32, as applicable. The department shall prescribe the form of the application and certification required by this subitem as well as the penalties for noncompliance. The eligibility and transition rules provided in the safe harbor provisions of Revenue Procedure 96-32 must be taken into account by the department in determining compliance. Compliance with this subitem does not require displacement of any tenant before the termination of the tenant's lease agreement; (iv) no later than sixty calendar days following the notification to any nonprofit housing corporation or its instrumentality of an approved exemption under this subitem, the department shall also notify the chief administrative officer of any county and, as applicable, any municipality with jurisdiction over property determined to be exempt under this subitem; B. This SECTION takes effect upon approval by the Governor and applies prospectively to property of nonprofit housing corporations or their instrumentalities eligible and first making application for the exemption for property tax years beginning after 2026. This SECTION shall not apply to any project that, prior to approval by the Governor of this act, had submitted an application or been approved for an exemption under Section 12-37-220(B)(11)(e).  Provided, however, all exempt projects under Section 12-37-220(B)(11)(e) are required to submit the required annual certifications to the department. SECTION 8.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----